Nevada, session 83, AB215.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 609 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 1.3 and 1.7 of this act.
Sec. 1.3. The Labor Commissioner shall:
1. Prepare an abstract of this chapter;
2. Post the abstract on the Internet website maintained by the
Office of Labor Commissioner; and
3. Include the abstract in a two-dimensional bar code,
commonly known as a QR code, or other machine-readable
barcode used for storing an Internet address, in any abstract
furnished to an employer pursuant to NRS 608.013.
Sec. 1.7. A violation of any provision of the federal Fair
Labor Standards Act of 1938, 29 U.S.C. §§ 201 et seq., or any
regulation adopted pursuant thereto, including, without limitation,
29 C.F.R. Part 570, relating to the hours of work and conditions of
employment permitted for a child under 16 years of age shall be
deemed to be a violation of this chapter.
Sec. 2. NRS 609.240 is hereby amended to read as follows:
609.240 1. No child under the age of 16 years may be
employed, permitted or suffered to work at any gainful occupation,
other than employment as a performer in the production of a motion
picture or work on a farm, more than [48] 40 hours in any 1 week,
or more than 8 hours in any 1 day.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and NRS
609.230, no child may be employed, permitted or suffered to work
at any gainful occupation, other than employment as a lifeguard,
employee of an arcade, stage or theatrical performer or performer
in the production of a motion picture or work on a farm, between
11 p.m. and 6 a.m. on any night immediately preceding a school
day if the child:
(a) Is enrolled in high school at a public or private school;
(b) Is 16 years of age or older and under 19 years of age; and
(c) Is not declared emancipated pursuant to NRS 129.080 to
129.140, inclusive.
 A school district or other governing body of the high school or
juvenile court may grant an exemption from the restrictions of this
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
subsection if the school district, governing body or juvenile court,
as applicable, determines the exemption is in the best interest of
the child.
3. The presence of a child in any establishment during working
hours is prima facie evidence of employment of the child therein.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Private school” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 394.103.
(b) “Public school” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 385.007.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)